District of Columbia statutes.
8-1601

Consent of Congress to compact; rights reserved by Congress.

(a)

The consent of Congress is hereby given to the States of Maryland and West Virginia and the Commonwealths of Virginia and Pennsylvania and the District of Columbia to enter into the compact to create a Potomac Valley Conservancy District and to establish an Interstate Commission on the Potomac River Basin, and to each and every part and article thereof; provided, that nothing contained in such compact shall be construed as impairing or in any manner affecting any right or jurisdiction of the United States in and over the region which forms the subject of this compact.

(b)

The right to alter, amend, or repeal this section is hereby expressly reserved.

July 11, 1940, 54 Stat. 748, ch. 579
1981 Ed., § 7-1301.
1973 Ed., § 7-1501.